Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-206.5 Coverage for child
health supervision services. (a) All accident and health or sickness
insurance policies issued in this State that provide coverage for the children
of the insured shall provide coverage for child health supervision services
from the moment of birth through age five years. These services shall be
exempt from any deductible provisions, and immunizations shall be exempt from
any copayment provisions, which may be in force in these policies or contracts.

(b) Child health supervision services shall
include twelve visits at approximately the following intervals: birth; two
months; four months; six months; nine months; twelve months; fifteen months;
eighteen months; two years; three years; four years; and five years. Services
to be covered at each visit shall include a history, physical examination,
developmental assessment, anticipatory guidance, immunizations, and laboratory
tests, in keeping with prevailing medical standards. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "prevailing medical standards" means the
recommendations of the Immunizations Practices Advisory Committee of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services and the American Academy of
Pediatrics; provided that in the event that the recommendations of the
committee and the academy differ, the department of health shall determine
which recommendations shall apply.

(c) Minimum benefits may be limited to one
visit payable to one provider for all of the services provided at each visit
cited in this section, except that the limitations authorized by this
subsection shall not apply to immunizations recommended by the Immunizations
Practices Advisory Committee of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services and the American Academy of Pediatrics; provided that in the
event that the recommendations of the committee and the academy differ, the
department of health shall determine which recommendations shall apply.

(d) This section does not apply to disability
income, specified disease, medicare supplement, or hospital indemnity policies.

(e) For the purposes of this section,
"child health supervision services" means physician-delivered,
physician-supervised, physician assistant-delivered, or nurse-delivered
services as defined by section 457-2 ("registered nurse"), which
shall include as the minimum benefit coverage for services delivered at
intervals and scope stated in this section. [L 1988, c 201, §2; am L 1993, c
83, §2 and c 362, §4; am L 2003, c 212, §77; am L 2016, c 141, §8]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next